Missouri, session 2026, HB2524.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 650.475, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 1.3050, 590.656, and 650.475, to read as follows:
1.3050. No state funds, including in the form of personnel or facilities, shall be
used in the enforcement of discriminatory immigration policies, including policies based
on racial profiling or that violate the constitutional rights of individuals.
590.656. All peace officers of the state or any political subdivision thereof shall
participate in training on racial profiling and constitutional rights, including
constitutional rights of immigrants. Such training shall occur at least yearly.
650.475. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no government entity,
political subdivision, or government official within the state of Missouri shall prohibit, or in
any way restrict, any government entity or official from communicating or cooperating with
the United States Bureau of Immigration and Customs Enforcement regarding the citizenship
or immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any individual. The provisions of this
subsection shall apply only when there is a clear and documented public safety concern.
2. Municipalities and political subdivisions may collect and share the identity of
persons by the same means the Federal Bureau of Investigation or its successor agency uses in
its Integrated Automated Fingerprint Identification System or its successor program.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person or agency within the state of
Missouri shall prohibit, or in any way restrict, a public employee from doing any of the
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2524 2
following with respect to information regarding the immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of
any individual:
(1) Sending such information to, or requesting or receiving such information from,
the United States Bureau of Immigration and Customs Enforcement;
(2) Maintaining such information; or
(3) Exchanging such information with any other federal, state, or local government
entity.

The provisions of this subsection shall apply only when there is a clear and documented
public safety concern.
4. Upon the complaint of any state resident regarding a specific government entity,
agency, or political subdivision of this state or prior to the provision of funds or awarding of
any grants to a government entity, agency, or political subdivision of this state, any member
of the general assembly may request that the attorney general of the state of Missouri issue an
opinion stating whether the government entity, agency, or political subdivision has current
policies in contravention of subsections 1 and 3 of this section.
5. No state agency or department shall provide any funding or award any monetary
grants to any government entity, agency, or political subdivision determined under subsection
4 of this section to have a policy in contravention of subsections 1 and 3 of this section until
the policy is repealed or no longer in effect.
6. The provisions of subsections 1 and 3 of this section shall not apply to any state or
local agency administering one or more federal public benefit programs as such term is
defined in 8 U.S.C. Section 1612.
7. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, no political
subdivision, government entity, or government official shall cooperate with the
enforcement of any immigration practice that is based on racial profiling or violates
the constitutional rights of any individual.
✔